Nevada, session 83, AB322-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 597 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 8.7, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in NRS 597.998 and sections 2 to 8.7,
inclusive, of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in sections 2.5 to 5, inclusive, of this act
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 2.5. “Certificate of analysis” means a document
produced by a laboratory describing the results of the laboratory’s
testing of a kratom product.
Sec. 3. “Division” means the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and Human
Services.
Sec. 4. “Food” means any food, food product, food
ingredient, dietary ingredient, dietary supplement or beverage
intended for ultimate human consumption.
Sec. 4.5. “Kratom extract” means a kratom product
containing any part of the leaf of the Mitragyna Speciosa plant
that has been extracted and concentrated to provide a dosage that
is more standardized.
Sec. 5. “Kratom product” means food containing any part of
the leaf of the Mitragyna Speciosa plant, or an extract thereof,
which is manufactured as a powder, capsule, pill or other edible
form.
Sec. 6. 1. A person shall not sell or offer to sell a kratom
product to an end user unless the kratom product has been
registered with the Division pursuant to this section.
2. A person who wishes to register a kratom product must
submit to the Division:
(a) An application on a form prescribed by the Division.
(b) A fee in an amount established by the Division by
regulation.
(c) A certificate of analysis for the kratom product which:
(1) Is produced by an independent laboratory that meets
any requirements set forth in regulations adopted by the Division
pursuant to section 7 of this act. Such requirements may include,
without limitation, a requirement that the independent laboratory
meet any accreditation standards required by the Division relating
to the testing of food.
-
*AB322_R3*

– 4 –
(2) Provides sufficient information about the kratom
product to enable the Division to determine whether the kratom
product complies with the provisions of NRS 597.998 and sections
2 to 8.7, inclusive, of this act.
(d) Any other information and documentation that the
Division deems necessary to ensure that the kratom product meets
the requirements of NRS 597.998 and sections 2 to 8.7, inclusive,
of this act and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
3. A registration issued pursuant to this section expires 1 year
after issuance and may be renewed by submitting to the Division
an application for renewal and the same fees and materials
required by paragraphs (b), (c) and (d) of subsection 2 for an
initial registration.
Sec. 6.5. 1. If the Division has reasonable cause to believe
that the information contained on the label of, or the certificate of
analysis for, a kratom product is inaccurate, the Division may
require the person who registered the kratom product to send the
kratom product to a laboratory selected by the Division to conduct
testing on the kratom product.
2. After the testing conducted pursuant to subsection 1 is
completed, the Division shall send the person who registered the
kratom product a bill for the costs of the testing. If the person fails
to pay those costs within a period of time after the receipt of the
bill established by the Division by regulation, the Division shall
revoke the registration of the kratom product.
Sec. 7. The Division may adopt regulations as it determines
to be necessary or advisable to carry out the provisions of NRS
597.998 and sections 2 to 8.7, inclusive of this act.
Sec. 7.5. 1. If a person submits to the United States Food
and Drug Administration a report pursuant to 21 U.S.C. § 379aa-1
concerning a serious adverse event involving a kratom product
that the person has registered pursuant to section 6 of this act, the
person shall send a copy of that report to the Division by certified
mail within a period of time established by the Division by
regulation.
2. Failure to send to the Division a copy of the report
described in subsection 1 within the time required by subsection 1,
constitutes grounds for the revocation of the registration of the
kratom product about which the report relates.
Sec. 8. 1. Any person may report to the Division on a form
prescribed by the Division a suspected violation of NRS 597.998 or
sections 2 to 8.7, inclusive, of this act.
2. If the Division determines that the allegations in a
complaint are credible and relate to the content or labeling of, or a
certificate of analysis for, a kratom product, the Division shall
-
*AB322_R3*

– 5 –
require the person who committed the alleged violation to obtain
and provide to the Division, within a period of time prescribed by
the Division by regulation, a new certificate of analysis which
complies with paragraph (c) of subsection 2 of section 6 of this act
for the kratom product.
3. If a person fails to provide the Division with a certificate of
analysis pursuant to subsection 2, the Division shall revoke the
registration for the kratom product.
Sec. 8.3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if
mitragynine or any of its constituent alkaloids are added to
schedule I, II, III, IV or V by the State Board of Pharmacy by
regulation pursuant to NRS 453.146, a person who engages in the
possession, delivery, production, sale or use of a kratom product
that meets the requirements of NRS 597.998 and sections 2 to 8.7,
inclusive, of this act and who confines his or her activities to those
authorized by NRS 597.998 and sections 2 to 8.7, inclusive, of this
act does not violate any law, ordinance, rule or regulation of this
State or any political subdivision of this State and such conduct
may not constitute the basis for any investigation, detention,
search, seizure, arrest, prosecution or other legal penalty against
the person.
Sec. 8.7. 1. A person who violates any provision of NRS
597.998 and sections 2 to 8.7, inclusive, of this act is subject to an
administrative fine in an amount not to exceed $500 for a first
offense and $1,000 for a second or subsequent offense.
2. Upon the request of a person to whom an administrative
fine is issued, the Division shall provide notice of and conduct a
hearing in accordance with the provisions of chapter 233B of
NRS.
Sec. 9. NRS 597.998 is hereby amended to read as follows:
597.998 1. A person shall not knowingly distribute, sell or
offer to sell any material, compound, mixture or preparation
containing a kratom product to a child under the age of 18 years.
2. A person shall not knowingly prepare, distribute, advertise,
sell or offer to sell a kratom product that [is] :
(a) Is adulterated , as defined in 21 U.S.C. § 342, or combined
or packaged with [a] :
(1) A controlled substance or a dangerous drug, as defined
in chapter 454 of NRS, or any poisonous or deleterious substance;
or
(2) Any substance that affects the quality or strength of the
kratom product to such a degree as to render the kratom product
injurious to a consumer [. A person has not violated the provisions
of this subsection if he or she can show by a preponderance of
evidence that he or she relied in good faith upon the representations
-
*AB322_R3*

– 6 –
of a manufacturer, processor, packer or distributor of the kratom
product.
3. A person shall not sell a kratom product that does not have a
label that clearly sets forth the ingredients and directions for the safe
and effective use of the kratom product.
4. A person who violates any provision of this section is
subject to a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 for each violation.
5. As used in this section, “kratom product” means any product
or ingredient containing:
(a) Any part of the leaf of the Mitragyna Speciosa plant if the
plant contains the alkaloid mitragynine or 7-hydroxymitragynine; or
(b) A synthetic material that contains the alkaloid mitragynine
or 7-hydroxymitragynine,
 regardless of whether the product or ingredient is labeled or sold
for human consumption.] ;
(b) Contains a level of 7-hydroxymitragynine in the alkaloid
fraction that is greater than 1 percent of the alkaloid composition
of the kratom product;
(c) Contains a synthetic alkaloid, including, without limitation,
synthetic mitragynine, synthetic 7-hydroxymitragynine or any
synthetically derived compound of the Mitragyna Speciosa plant;
(d) Does not include a label that complies with any
requirements for the labeling of food established by the State
Board of Health by regulations adopted pursuant to NRS 439.200
or 446.940 and that clearly sets forth:
(1) The recommended size of an individual serving;
(2) The maximum limits for individual servings per day;
(3) The number of servings equal to the size of one
recommended individual serving that are contained in the
package; and
(4) Directions for the safe and effective use of the kratom
product.
(e) A kratom extract which contains levels of residual solvents
that exceed the levels authorized by chapter 467 of the United
States Pharmacopeia-National Formulary, published by the
United States Pharmacopeial Convention.
Sec. 9.5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9.7. NRS 453.005 is hereby amended to read as follows:
453.005 The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the
extent that they are inconsistent with the provisions of [title] :
1. Title 56 of NRS.
2. NRS 597.998 and sections 2 to 8.7, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 9.8. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services for personnel, travel,
-
*AB322_R3*

– 7 –
operating, equipment and information services expenses to carry out
the provisions of this act the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2023-2024 .................................. $121,162
For the Fiscal Year 2024-2025 .................................. $140,010
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 20, 2024, and September 19, 2025, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 20, 2024, and September 19, 2025, respectively.
Sec. 10. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Section 9.8 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2023.
3. Sections 1 to 9.7, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2024, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB322_R3*